Maryland, session 2025, HB0871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–3701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 752 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) “Community health worker” means a frontline public health worker who:
(1) Is a trusted member of, or has an unusually close understanding of, the
community being served;
(2) Serves as a liaison to, link to, or intermediary between health and social
services and the community to:
(i) Facilitate access to services; and
(ii) Improve the quality and cultural competence of service delivery;
and
(3) Builds individual and community capacity by increasing health
knowledge and self–sufficiency through a range of activities, including:
(i) Outreach;
(ii) Community education;
(iii) The provision of information to support individuals in the
community;
(iv) Social support; and
(v) Advocacy.
19–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Commission” means the Health Services Cost Review Commission.
(3) (i) “Community benefit” means a planned, organized, and measured
activity that is intended to meet identified community health needs within a service area.
(ii) “Community benefit” may include:
1. A community health service;
2. Health professional education;
3. Research;
4. A financial contribution;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 752
5. A community–building activity, including partnerships
with community–based organizations;
6. Charity care;
7. An activity described under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph that is funded by a foundation;
8. A mission–driven health service;
9. An operation related to an activity described under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph; [and]
10. Financial or in–kind support of the Maryland Behavioral
Health Crisis Response System; AND
11. A COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER WORKFORCE
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 19–303.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) “Community Benefit Reporting Workgroup” means the Community
Benefit Reporting Workgroup established in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(5) “Community health needs assessment” means the process required by
the Affordable Care Act by which unmet community health care needs and priorities are
identified by a nonprofit hospital in accordance with § 501(r)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code.
19–303.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 13–3701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT UNDER § 19–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY
INCLUDE A PARTNERSHIP BETWEEN A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL AND A
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION TO ESTABLISH A COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER
WORKFORCE PROGRAM.
(2) THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF A COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER
WORKFORCE PROGRAM SHALL BE TO PROVIDE SERVICES TO PATIENTS OF A
NONPROFIT HOSPITAL THAT ARE INTENDED TO IMPROVE HEALTH OUTCOMES AND
ADDRESS SOCIAL DETERMINANTS OF HEALTH.
– 3 –

Ch. 752 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) A PARTNERSHIP ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL MAY
BE EXECUTED THROUGH A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING BETWEEN A
NONPROFIT HOSPITAL AND A COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION.
(2) THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE PROGRAM DESIGN;
(II) GOALS FOR PATIENT HEALTH OUTCOMES;
(III) IMPLEMENTATION PROCEDURES;
(IV) CRITERIA FOR EVALUATION AND IMPACT MEASUREMENT;
(V) DATA COLLECTION, MANAGEMENT, AND REPORTING
STANDARDS AND PROTOCOLS THAT ARE IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE
FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING THE FEDERAL HEALTH
INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT; AND
(VI) AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE NONPROFIT HOSPITAL AND
THE COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION IDENTIFYING WHICH PARTY WILL BE
RESPONSIBLE FOR:
1. RECRUITING AND EMPLOYING THE COMMUNITY
HEALTH WORKER WORKFORCE;
2. SUPERVISING THE WORKFORCE IN THE SETTINGS IN
WHICH THE COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKERS WILL PROVIDE SERVICES TO PATIENTS;
3. TRAINING THE WORKFORCE; AND
4. PROVIDING EMPLOYER–SPONSORED HEALTH
INSURANCE COVERAGE TO EACH COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER.
(D) A PARTNERSHIP ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL MAY
PROVIDE HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE TO EACH COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER
FOR THE DURATION OF THE PROGRAM IF THE INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT HAVE HEALTH
INSURANCE COVERAGE AND REQUESTS COVERAGE.
(E) A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL AND A COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION
MAY COLLABORATE TO IDENTIFY FINANCIAL RESOURCES TO ADDRESS COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH INCREASING ADMINISTRATIVE CAPACITY WITHIN THE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 752
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION NECESSARY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PARTNERSHIP.
(F) SUBJECT TO OTHER PROVISIONS OF LAW GOVERNING COMMUNITY
BENEFITS AND ON THE AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES, A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL MAY
PROVIDE FINANCIAL SUPPORT TO A COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION TO COVER
THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH INCREASING ADMINISTRATIVE CAPACITY WITHIN THE
COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION NECESSARY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PARTNERSHIP.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –